Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB184.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail of a book by a public library.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718192021